Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1742
Foreign support order; applicability of law.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the local law of this state shall apply in all actions and proceedings concerning the issuance, enforcement, and duration of income withholding orders issued by a court of this state based upon a foreign support order entered pursuant to section 43-1729.

(2) The local law of the jurisdiction which issued the foreign support order shall govern the following:

(a) The interpretation of the support order including amount of support, form of payment, and duration of support;

(b) The amount of support arrearages necessary to require the issuance of an income withholding order or notice; and

(c) The definition of what costs, in addition to the periodic support obligation, are included as arrearages which are enforceable by income withholding, including, but not limited to, interest, attorney's fees, court costs, and costs of paternity testing.

(3) The court shall apply the statute of limitations for maintaining an action on arrearages of support payments of either the local law of this state or of the state which issued the foreign support order, whichever provides the longer period of time.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 62.